Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4482.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [168.1257] SURVIVOR SUPPORT PLATES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Issuance of plates. new text end new text begin The commissioner must issue survivor support special license plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, recreational vehicle, one-ton pickup truck, or motorcycle; new text end new text begin (2) pays a fee in the amount specified for special plates under section 168.12, subdivision 5; new text end new text begin (3) pays the registration tax required under section 168.013; new text end new text begin (4) pays the fees required under this chapter; new text end new text begin (5) contributes $30 upon initial application and a minimum of $30 annually to the crime victims account established in section 611A.612; and new text end new text begin (6) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Design. new text end new text begin The commissioner must adopt a suitable plate design in consultation with the Minnesota Coalition Against Sexual Assault, Violence Free Minnesota, and other interested groups identified by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin No refund. new text end new text begin Contributions under this section must not be refunded. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Plate transfers. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding section 168.12, subdivision 1, on payment of a transfer fee of $5, plates issued under this section may be transferred to another motor vehicle if the subsequent vehicle is: new text end new text begin (1) qualified under subdivision 1, clause (1), to bear the special plates; and new text end new text begin (2) registered to the same individual to whom the special plates were originally issued. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Contribution and fees credited. new text end new text begin Contributions collected under subdivision 1, clause (5), must be deposited in the crime victims account under section 611A.612. An amount sufficient to pay the department's cost to administer the account is appropriated to the commissioner from that account. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Record. new text end new text begin The commissioner must maintain a record of the number of plates issued under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin Special plates issued under this section are not subject to section 168.1293, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, for survivor support special license plates issued on or after that date. new text end